Utah statutes.
35A-1-305.   Independence of Workforce Appeals Board.
A member of the Workforce Appeals Board may not participate in any case in
which the member is an interested party.  Each decision of a member of the
Workforce Appeals Board shall represent the member’s independent judgment.
